Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.720

Construction of laws concerning right to vote.

In further recognition of the protections for the right to vote provided by the Constitution of the state of Washington, statutes, rules and regulations, and local laws, town charters, and ordinances related to the right to vote shall be construed liberally in favor of:

(1) Protecting the right to cast an effective ballot;

(2) Ensuring that eligible voters are not impaired in registering to vote or voting including having their votes counted; and

(3) Ensuring that voters of race, color, and language minority groups have equitable access to fully participate in the electoral process in registering to vote and voting free from improper dilution or abridgement of voting power.

[ 2023 c 56 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: "This act takes effect January 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 56 s 14.]